Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Landlord” means an owner of a dwelling unit that has entered into  a rental or lease
agreement with a tenant.
(2) “Low  income household” means a household of one or more individuals whose com-
bined incomes are at or below 60 percent of the  area median income and includes, but is not
limited to, a household of one or more individuals who are homeless or at  risk of becoming
homeless.
(3) “Tenant” means an individual or a family who has or will  be entering into a rental
or lease agreement with a landlord.
SECTION 2. (1) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall develop and im-
plement the Rent  Guarantee Program for the purpose of providing incentives and financial
assistance to landlords that rent or lease to low income households  by guaranteeing pay-
ments to landlords for unpaid rent  and for eviction and property damage costs as described
in this section. Department administration of the program is subject to Oregon  Housing
Stability Council policy, rules and standards.
(2) A tenant is eligible to participate in the program if the tenant:
(a) Resides in a low income household;
(b) Experiences barriers to obtaining housing including but not limited to:
(A) Poor credit history or ratings;
(B) Criminal background history; or
(C) A history of housing evictions; and
(c) Successfully completes the tenant training and  certification process implemented by
the department under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) As part of the program  implemented under this section, the department shall provide
training to, and a certification process for,  tenants from low income households for the
purpose of  providing tenants with information on how to achieve and maintain a successful
tenancy and providing reliable accreditation of tenants to landlords that are  considering
renting or leasing to tenants from low income households.
(4) A landlord may submit a request for  financial assistance to the department in ac-
cordance with  rules adopted by the council. Financial assistance to landlords under the
program is limited as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 2724 (HB 2724-A) Page 1
(a) Reimbursement for unpaid rent and payment of  eviction and damage costs are limited
to circumstances involving rental or lease agreements entered into with  tenants determined
to be eligible under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Financial assistance is limited to  reimbursement for unpaid rent and eviction and
damage costs incurred during the first 12 months of any single rental or lease agreement;
(c) Reimbursement for unpaid rent is limited to a maximum  of $2,000 per eligible tenant;
(d) Financial assistance paid under the program to a landlord is limited to a  maximum
of $5,000 per landlord; and
(e) Payment of financial assistance is contingent on  the landlord’s submission of a com-
plete and accurate reimbursement request, verification of unpaid rent and eviction or dam-
age claims by the department  or program provider described in subsection (6) of this section
and cooperation with the collection of data to  measure program performance outcomes as
described in subsection (6) of this section.
(5) Before receipt of  payments of financial assistance under the program, a landlord must
provide to the department or the program provider described in subsection  (6) of this section
a report containing information required by rule adopted by the  council. The report must
contain, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Information regarding eligible tenants with which the landlord  entered into tenancy
agreements including, but not limited to,  the length of tenancy and reason for termination
of tenancy, if applicable; and
(b) The amounts of unpaid rent  and eviction and damage costs not reimbursed by finan-
cial assistance received by the landlord under the program.
(6)(a) The department may contract with a public  or private provider to administer the
program within  an individual county or region of this state and to distribute financial as-
sistance to eligible landlords as provided in this  subsection. The department is not subject
to the  provisions of ORS chapter 279A or 279B in awarding a contract under the provisions
of this subsection. The department  shall, in consultation with the council, establish criteria
for proposals, prepare and  publish requests for proposals, receive proposals and award con-
tracts to eligible providers. Eligible providers must, at a minimum:
(A) Have experience  providing tenant readiness education sufficient to provide tenant
training and certification as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(B) Have experience placing persons in low income households into permanent housing;
(C) Have  experience working collaboratively with local landlords and service providers;
and
(D) Demonstrate the organizational capacity to administer the program, including the
ability to track data  and performance measure outcomes and to timely process requests for
and payments of financial assistance.
(b) Program providers shall, in accordance with rules adopted by the council:
(A) Enter information into the homeless management  information system maintained by
the department;
(B) Provide reports regarding the number of landlords and tenants  participating in the
program, demographic information about  tenants, identified tenant risk factors and the
number and amount of requests for financial assistance made under the program;
(C) Review and verify requests for financial assistance and  make payments in accordance
with established department processes for distributing funds; and
(D) Collect data to measure the following program performance outcomes:
(i) Increased housing stability, as measured by the percentage  of total program partic-
ipants who reside in and maintain permanent housing for a minimum of 12 months;
(ii) Increased landlord participation, as measured by  the percentage increase in the
number of landlords participating in the program; and
Enrolled House Bill 2724 (HB 2724-A) Page 2
(iii) Successful tenant readiness education, as  measured by the percentage of tenants
successfully completing the tenant training  and receiving certification as described in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(7) Nothing in this section prohibits a landlord from  participating in the Housing Choice
Landlord Guarantee Program under ORS 456.375 to 456.390 or the  Housing Choice Voucher
Program under 42 U.S.C. 1437f(o).
(8) The department may not pay  financial assistance under the Rent Guarantee Program
from any source other than available funds in  the Rent Guarantee Program Fund established
in section 3 of this 2017 Act. Amounts due and payable under the program  shall not consti-
tute a debt  of the state or a lending of the credit of the state within the meaning of any
constitutional or statutory limitation.
(9) The department shall submit  an annual report to the interim legislative committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to housing no later than September 15th of each  year
regarding the implementation and status of the program, the number of participants  in the
program, amounts of financial assistance requested and paid and the performance outcomes
measured by the program.
(10) The  council, in consultation with the department, shall adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Rent Guarantee Program Fund is established within the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Rent Guar-
antee Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Rent Guarantee Program Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative  As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts received from state or federal sources to be deposited into the fund;
(d) Income derived from moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The  department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs associ-
ated with the fund and with implementing  and maintaining the Rent Guarantee Program
under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services Department by  section 1, chapter _____,
Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is in-
creased by $223,247 for the Rent Guarantee Program.
Enrolled House Bill 2724 (HB 2724-A) Page 3
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2724 (HB 2724-A) Page 4